Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 3
GASOLINE ADDITIVES

12-9-70. Study and review of gasoline additives.

As used in this Code section, the term "MTBE" means methyl tertiary butyl ether.

The director of the Environmental Protection Division of the department is authorized and urged to study and review the use of gasoline additives in this state and to develop rules and regulations not later than January 1, 2008, for consideration by the Board of Natural Resources to provide for a phase out of the permissible use of gasoline containing MTBE in a manner designed to coordinate such phase out with other states adjacent to this state to the extent practicable; and the board is authorized to adopt rules and regulations for such purpose. In developing such rules and regulations, the director is urged to consider the need to ensure adequate supplies of gasoline in this state, environmental issues such as air quality and ground-water protection, the overall benefits and concerns with various gasoline additives, the use of additives by adjacent states, and the viability of ethanol for use as an additive to the greatest extent practicable.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 547, § 2/SB 636.)